Utah statutes.
19-5-117.   Purpose and construction of chapter.
(1)  It is the purpose of this chapter to provide:
(a)  additional and cumulative remedies to prevent, abate, and control the
pollution of the waters of the state; and
(b)  sufficient authority to allow the state to meet federal requirements for
the state's assumption of primacy under the federal Water Pollution Control
Act, as amended by the Water Quality Act of 1987, 33 U.S.C. Section 1251 et
seq.
(2)  Nothing  in this chapter:
(a)  abridges or alters rights of action or remedies in equity or under common
or statutory law, criminal or civil; or
(b)  estops the state or any municipality or person, as riparian owners or
otherwise, in the exercise of their rights in equity or under common or
statutory law to suppress nuisances or to abate pollution.
